New York, session 2025-2026, A5476.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a 2 new section 19-0330 to read as follows: 3 § 19-0330. Release of certain chemical compounds prohibited. 4 1. The intentional injection, release or dispersion, by any means, of 5 chemicals, chemical compounds, substances or apparatus within the 6 borders of this state into the atmosphere with the express purpose of 7 affecting temperature, weather or the intensity of sunlight is prohibit- 8 ed. 9 2. Any person who observes a geoengineering or weather modification 10 activity conducted in violation of this section may report such observed 11 violation to the department online or by telephone, mail, or e-mail. 12 (a) The department shall establish an e-mail address and an online 13 form for individuals to report observed violations of this section. The 14 department shall make the e-mail address and online form publicly acces- 15 sible on its website. 16 (b) The department shall establish a method for intake and screening 17 of the reports made pursuant to this section. The department shall 18 investigate any report that warrants further review to determine whether 19 a violation of this section occurred. 20 (c) The department may request assistance from the department of 21 health, the division of homeland security and emergency services, the 22 department of transportation, or any other appropriate agency. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09287-03-5 A. 5476--A 2 1 3. All operators of public infrastructure shall report monthly to the 2 department, using a method determined by the department. Such reports 3 shall identify any aircraft observed, recorded, or documented that may 4 be equipped, modified, or configured for geoengineering or weather 5 modification activities; including the aircraft's registration number, 6 type, date and time of observation, and the basis for such identifica- 7 tion. 8 4. The department shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to 9 implement this section. 10 § 2. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a new 11 section 71-2114 to read as follows: 12 § 71-2114. Violations of section 19-0330 of article 19 of this chapter. 13 1. Any person, including any public or private corporation, who 14 conducts a geoengineering or weather modification activity in violation 15 of section 19-0330 of this chapter shall be guilty of a class E felony. 16 Where the violator of such section is a corporation, the officers, 17 directors, or employees of such corporation shall be guilty of a class E 18 felony. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense. 19 2. Where the violator of such section is an aircraft operator or 20 controller, such person shall be guilty of a class E felony, and upon 21 conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five thou- 22 sand dollars and by a term of imprisonment not exceeding five years. 23 Each violation shall constitute a separate offense. 24 3. Any fines collected for violations of section 19-0330 of this chap- 25 ter shall be deposited into the air quality improvement fund, in accord- 26 ance with the provisions of section ninety-nine-rr of the state finance 27 law. 28 § 3. Subdivision 1 of section 71-2105 of the environmental conserva- 29 tion law, as amended by chapter 99 of the laws of 2010, is amended to 30 read as follows: 31 1. Except as provided in section 71-2113 and 71-2114 of this title, 32 any person who shall wilfully violate any of the provisions of article 33 19 of this chapter or any code, rule or regulation promulgated pursuant 34 thereto or any final determination or order of the commissioner made 35 pursuant to article 19 of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, 36 and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine, in the case 37 of a first conviction, of not less than five hundred dollars nor more 38 than eighteen thousand dollars or by imprisonment for a term of not more 39 than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment, for each separate 40 violation. If the conviction is for an offense committed after the first 41 conviction of such person under this subdivision, such person shall be 42 punished by a fine not to exceed twenty-six thousand dollars, or by 43 imprisonment, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Each day on which 44 such violation occurs shall constitute a separate violation. 45 § 4. Subdivision 2 of section 99-rr of the state finance law, as added 46 by section 7 of part T of chapter 58 of the laws of 2024, is amended to 47 read as follows: 48 2. Such fund shall consist of revenues received by the state pursuant 49 to section 19-0328 of the environmental conservation law, fines 50 collected pursuant to subdivision three of section 71-2114 of the envi- 51 ronmental conservation law and all other moneys, appropriated, credited, 52 or transferred thereto from any other fund or source pursuant to law. 53 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.